Utah statutes.
63M-1-801.   Creation of shared foreign sales corporations.
The office may create one or more shared foreign sales corporations,
qualifying as such under Section 927(g), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and
may name directors or managers of these corporations at its discretion.
